District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-311.02

Cooperative purchasing agreement.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1102, 32 DCR 7396
Dec. 9, 2003, D.C. Law 15-42, § 2, 50 DCR 8959
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 130(f), 52 DCR 10637
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1191.2.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Cooperative Purchasing Agreement Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-59, January 24, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 988).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Cooperative Purchasing Agreement Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-242, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2755).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Cooperative Purchasing Agreement Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-111, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7636).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Cooperative Purchasing Agreements Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-179, November 19, 2001, 48 DCR 11063).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Cooperative Purchasing Agreement Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-518, October 24, 2002, 49 DCR 10504).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Cooperative Purchasing Agreement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-11, January 27, 2003, 50 DCR 1483).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Cooperative Purchasing Agreement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-227, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10712).